North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-31 Multiple-Party Accounts — Provisions Relating to Effect of Death [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 351, § 4]

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 351, S.L. 1991, repealed former Chapter 30.1-31, entitled “Multiple-Party Accounts — Provisions Relating to Effect of Death.” Section 3 of chapter 351, S.L. 1991 enacted a new Chapter 30.1-31, which has been substituted in place of the former chapter.